District of Columbia statutes.
4-552

Domestic Violence Hotline.

(a)

The Office shall establish the Domestic Violence Hotline to provide assistance for victims and potential victims of domestic violence beginning October 1, 2014.

(b)

(1)

The Hotline shall:

(A)

Be operated by a domestic violence program funded and supported by the Office;

(B)

Provide a direct toll-free number that accepts calls and text messages;

(C)

Be directly available to callers, without an intermediary agency;

(D)

Be available on a 24-hour basis;

(E)

Provide live assistance by domestic violence counselors; and

(F)

Offer anonymity and confidentiality to enable a victim or a friend or family member of a victim to seek support without giving his or her legal name.

(2)

The requirements of paragraph (1)(F) of this subsection shall not be construed to limit or supersede any mandatory reporting requirements under District law.

(c)

The Office shall develop and implement an outreach campaign to educate District residents about the Hotline.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 3033, 60 DCR 12472
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.
Section 3031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle D of Title III of the act may be cited as the “Domestic Violence Hotline Establishment Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 3033 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 3033 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
This section is referenced in § 4-551.